Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1666
Violations; penalties.

(1) Violation of the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act or of any application approval, approval to operate, order, rule, regulation, or requirement of the Chief Water Officer under the act is a Class V misdemeanor. Each day that the violation continues constitutes a separate and distinct offense.

(2) Any person who willfully obstructs, hinders, or prevents the Chief Water Officer from performing the duties imposed by the act commits a Class IV misdemeanor.

(3) Any owner or any person who engages in the construction, reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment of any dam or who knowingly does work on or permits work to be done on the dam without the approval of the Chief Water Officer or in violation of the act and who fails to immediately notify the Chief Water Officer thereof commits a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 66;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 304.